Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB677.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1329 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 1329. Valuation of acquired water and wastewater systems.* * *(d.1) Binding ratepayer referendum.--A municipality shall hold a public hearing explaining to what entity the municipality is selling the public utility, the sum of the public utility sale, any impact on water and wastewater rates and related services and any requirements under this section. In addition to the public hearing under this subsection, the municipality shall, for a period of 60 days prior to the sale of the public utili ty, conduct the following: 123456789101112131415161718 (1) Mail a referendum ballot to each ratepayer, at the address and electronic mail address of an account on file with the public utility, providing the ratepayer with notice of the sale, the ratepayer response deadline, the acquiring investor-owned utility, the sale price and the guidelines of a ratemaking rate base under this section.(2) Display notice of the proposed sale, the ratepayer response deadline, the acquiring investor-owned utility, the sale price and the guidelines of a ratemaking rate base under this section on the municipality's publicly accessible Internet website, newspaper and any public mailers, if applicable.(d.2) Referendum approval.--A public utility may not be acquired under this section unless a majority of the ratepayers under subsection (d.1) approve the acquisition within 60 days of the sale under subsection (d.1).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0677PN0676 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718